Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-602
Department of Health and Human Services; medical schools; inspection; examination of graduates.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall have the right at all times to inspect the equipment and methods of teaching in all medical colleges and medical schools of the state and shall have the power to refuse examination to the graduates of any school which, on proper notice and hearing, shall be adjudged not a medical college or medical school in good standing as defined by the laws of this state.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. VI, art. I, § 2, p. 750;

C.S.1922, § 8160;

C.S.1929, § 81-5602;

R.S.1943, § 81-602;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 842;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 731.